Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-4310.03
Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund. Money in the fund shall be used by the Tax Commissioner for the purposes of administering, collecting, and enforcing the tax imposed by section 77-4303, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund or the Department of Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 32;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 87;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 56;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 162.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.